Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-243
Cemeteries; lots; how conveyed; title.

A city of the first class may convey cemetery lots owned by such city, by certificates signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk under the seal of the city specifying that the person to whom the same is issued is the owner of the lot or lots described therein by number as laid down on such plat or map, for the purpose of interment. Such certificate shall vest in the proprietor, his or her heirs and assigns, a right in fee simple of such lot for the sole purpose of interment, under the regulations of the city council. Such certificates shall be entitled to be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the proper county without further acknowledgment, and such description of lots shall be deemed and recognized as a sufficient description thereof.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLIX, p. 258;

R.S.1913, § 4859;

C.S.1922, § 4027;

C.S.1929, § 16-244;

R.S.1943, § 16-243.